Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1326
Administrative services agreements authorized.

Any city, village, or rural or suburban fire protection district conducting a program may enter into an administrative services agreement with an appropriate organization authorized to conduct business in Nebraska to administer the service award benefit programs provided for in the Volunteer Emergency Responders Recruitment and Retention Act. No such agreement shall be entered into unless it will result in administrative economy and will be in the best interests of the participating cities, villages, and fire protection districts and the participants in such programs.

Laws 1999, LB 849, § 26;

Laws 2001, LB 808, § 18.